list of projects attended
Dermatology

1. kYMAB Study: A Phase IIb, Randomised, Double-blind,Placebo-controlled, Parallel Group, Multicentre Dose
Ranging Study of a Subcutaneous Anti-OX40L Monoclonal Antibody (KY1005) in Moderate-to-
Severe Atopic Dermatitis.(heavily involoved)
2.Beam Study: A PHASE 1/2 STUDY EVALUATING THE SAFETY AND EFFICACY OF A SINGLE DOSE OF AUTOLOGOUS CD34+ BASE EDITED HEMATOPOIETIC STEM CELLS (BEAM-101) IN PATIENTS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE AND SEVERE VASO-OCCLUSIVE CRISES (BEACON TRIAL)
3. TAK-1004 A Phase 2, Randomized, Double-Blind, Placebo-Controlled Study to Evaluate Safety, Tolerability, and Efficacy of TAK-079 in Patients With Persistent/Chronic Primary Immune Thrombocytopenia.
4. TAK-1006: A Phase 1b, Multicenter, Open-Label Study to Evaluate Safety, Tolerability,Pharmacokinetics, and Efficacy of Mezagitamab (TAK-079) in Patients With Primary IgA Nephropathy in Combination With Stable Background Therapy.
5.BMS-986347 Study: A Phase IV Postmarketing Study Evaluating Ozanimod Concentrations in the Breast Milk of Lactating Women Receiving Ozanimod Therapeutically
6.Eli Lilly_KLAA Study: A Phase 2, Randomized Study of Pirtobrutinib versus Placebo in Patients with Relapsing Multiple Sclerosis
7.Celgene Study: A Phase IV Postmarketing Study Evaluating Ozanimod Concentrations in the Breast Milk of Lactating Women Receiving Ozanimod Therapeutically
8.GSK HIV study: A Phase 4, open-label, single arm study to optimize implementation of CABENUVA for the treatment of HIV-1,for administration in U.S. community-based infusion centers or other alternate sites of administration
9.Sanofi LPS17007 study: A 24-Week, Multicenter, Randomized, Open Label, Parallel Group Trial Comparing the Efficacy and Safety of Insulin Glargine 300 U/mL (Gla 300) and Insulin Degludec 100 U/mL (IDeg 100) in Insulin Naïve People with Type 2 Diabetes Mellitus and Renal Impairment: TRENT Trial
10.Sanofi SFILPS17008 study: A 24-Week, Single-Arm, Phase 4 Clinical Study to Evaluate the Efficacy and Safety of Switching to iGlarLixi in People With Type 2 Diabetes Mellitus Uncontrolled on Once or Twice Daily Premixed Insulin Regimen 
11.SHIONOGI Obesity study: A Phase 2,multicenter,randomized,double-blind,dose-ranging,placebo-controlled study to assess the safety and efficacy of S-309309 in obese adults
12.Takeda DEN-301 Study: Phase III, Double-Blind, Randomized, Placebo-Controlled Trial to Investigate the Efficacy,Safety and Immunogenicity of a Tetravalent Dengue Vaccine (TDV) Administered Subcutaneously in Healthy Children Aged 4 – 16 Years Old
13.Takeda DEN-303 Study: A Phase 3, Follow-Up Trial to Evaluate Long-Term Safety and Antibody Persistence, and the Impact of a Booster Dose of a Tetravalent Dengue Vaccine Candidate in Healthy Adolescents and Adults in Areas Non-Endemic for Dengue
14. Eli Lilly GPIL Study: An Open-Label, Single-Arm, Phase 4 Study to Assess Glycemic Control When Adults with Type 2 Diabetes Switch from a GLP-1 RA to Tirzepatide (SURPASS-SWITCH-2)

Pre-PPD:
•	Infectious Diseases: A Phase III,Double-blind,Randomized,Placebo-controlled Trial to Investigate the Efficacy, Safety and Immunogenicity of a XXXX Vaccine in Health Children
•	Mental Disorders:(1). A Study of Safety and Tolerability of XXXX in Adult Subjects with Schizophrenia    (2).A Study of XXXX as Adjunctive Therapy in the Prevention of Relapse in Patients with Major Depressive Disorder.
•	Nervous System/Sense Organs: A Phase III, Double-blinded, Placebo-Controlled, Multicenter Study of XXX as Adjunctive Therapy in Major Depressive Disorder 
•	
•	Dermatology: A Phase IIb, Randomised, Double-blind, Placebo-controlled, Parallel Group, Multicentre Dose Ranging Study of a Subcutaneous XXXX  in Moderate-to-Severe Atopic Dermatitis
•	Metabology: An Open-Label, Single-Arm, Phase 4 Study to Assess Glycemic Control When Adults with Type 2 Diabetes Switch from XXXX to XXXX
•	Neuroscience: A Phase III, Randomized, Double-blinded, Double dummy, Placebo-Controlled, 3 arm, Parallel Group Study in Pediatric Subjects Evaluate the Efficacy and Safety of XXX for the Treatment of Relapsing-Remitting Multiple Sclerosis
•	Neuroscience: A Phase II, Randomized, Multi-Site Study to Develop and Validate a Computerized Functional Capacity Measure in Individuals with Mild Cognitive 
•	Neuroscience: A Phase II, Randomized, Double-blinded, Parallel Group Study of XXX and Cognitive Training for Mild Cognitive Impairment and Alzheimer's Dementia
•	Oncology: A Randomized Phase II Trial of XXX and XXX Versus XXX Alone in Patients Renal Cell Carcinoma

Zhenhua Yuan is a motivated, highly skilled biostatistician , he holds a master’s degree in Statistics from the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill and Ph.D. degree in biomedicine. I have over 7 years of experience in the clinical research and pharmaceutical industry. My expertise involves the study design, project management, statistical analysis, report preparation and presentation, and manuscript development for pre-clinical and Phase 1-3 studies, mainly in the therapeutic areas including neurology, oncology and cardiology, dermatology, and vaccine development for infectious diseases. In these areas I possess a proven track record of analyzing clinical data, producing results, and drawing meaningful insights that have helped make informed decisions. I have been functioning as statistics lead, responsibilities include project management, client communication, protocols review, authoring statistical analysis plans (SAPs) and reports, and quality control (QC) on the statistical analysis deliverables. I have authored or co-authored more than 40 publications in peer-reviewed journals and was granted two PCT patents. Additionally, I have strong leadership, communication, and presentation skills that allow me to effectively communicate complex statistical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.

Definitions:
Study Phase	Key Definition
Start up Phase/ Early study	Planning for the deliverables during the life of the study (review of study documentation, discuss scope of work, create initial timelines, initial version of SAP, work out strategy for the biostatistics team)
Maintenance/Development of a Deliverable	Development of the deliverable (may start on test/earlier cut of data, may include submission tasks)
During Deliverable	Executing the Deliverable (to be run on planned data cut, DB Lock associated with official review and delivery to Client),  eg. DMC, IA, Dryrun, DRM, Final, Submission
Close out phase/ End of study	Documentation in place, study area ready for archiving 
Note 1: This Checklist is intended for audience using our internal processes/systems. Similar steps are likely to be broadly applicable when working under client processes/systems although details may be different.	
Note 2: Please refer to Biowiki or TRI or reach out to your Line Manager/Mentor if there are questions about a task.	

Start up
Topic--	Category/Activity--	Task
Scope & Finance	Review - provide input 	Work with Biostatistics Project Lead (BPL) / Project Budget Lead (PBL) to review and understand the scope of work and budget.
Scope & Finance	Project Management	Proactively identify “out of scope” tasks and inform the BPL.
Timeline	Review - provide input 	Work with BPL, Lead Programmer (LP) on initial timeline.
Meetings	Project Management	Participate in preparing meeting slides, if needed.
Client KOM	Project Management	Attend the client Kick-off Meeting (KOM), if assigned.
B&P KOM	Project Management	Prepare the statistical strategy and ensures the team understands the statistical needs at the internal Biostatistics & Programming (B&P) KOM.
Protocol	Review - provide input 	Work with Senior Reviewer (SR) on Protocol Review and provide input (if contracted).
Protocol	Development	Calculate or review sample size calculation and document per Standard Operating Procedure (SOP).
Protocol	Development	Work with SR and estimands Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) to ensure the estimands are described appropriately if applicable when reviewing or writing the protocol as per SOP.
Randomization	Development	Prepare Randomization Specification/Authorization Form (RSAF) if included in scope, obtain approval, create randomization generation timeline and interact with external and internal groups as per SOP.
eTMF	Project Management	Be familiar with the Biostatistics and Programming required documentation to be filed in project eTMF (per EDL). Email final documents to the PBL and BPL with appropriate information (type of document, version, description) once finalized.
QTL	Development	Work with Subject Matter Champions (SMC)/ Data Analytics (DA) programmer on QTL spec, if included in scope.
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Case Report Form (CRF).
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Data Validation Manual (DVM) with Edit Checks.
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Data Transfer Specifications (DTS).
Lab Documents	Review	Review Lab Specs, if applicable.
IRT Documents	Review	Review IRT Requirements Document.
Protocol Deviation	Review - provide input 	Review the protocol deviation rules document and assign Bios severity codes, as needed.
Protocol Deviation	Project Management	Participate in regular Protocol Deviation Review meetings. Review the periodic Protocol Deviations Listing and assign Bios severity code, as needed.
SAP & Shells	Development	Prepare the Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) and shells, if contracted. Coordinate with PK/PD writer if Pharmacokinetics (PK) and/or Pharmacodynamics (PD) section is included in the SAP. Consult with Statistical Science group if the analysis methodology is more specialized and discuss with client counterpart prior to development.
SAP & Shells	Communication	Coordinate the project team review of SAP and shells and Medical Writer review as well if contracted.
SAP & Shells	Delivery	Obtain approvals from all internal reviewers per SOP before delivering the SAP to client reviewer and then tag the deliverable.
SAP & Shells	Communication	If SAP not contracted, collect any concerns related to an externally provided SAP and communicates any findings in writing to the Client for resolution, as appropriate. 
Training	Training	Assist BPL in ensuring project specific training and therapeutic area training (if applicable) are completed.
Communication	Project Management	Provide summary of basic study and therapeutic information to new team members.
Communication	Project Management	Pro-active risk management and escalation.
Scope & Finance	Communication	Work with BPL to ensure there is no outstanding ConMod on biostatistician related tasks.
Comments	Communication	Work with LP/BPL to ensure client comments filed in BTI under appropriate folder.
Communication/Unblinding	Development	Work with LP/BPL to create the blinding plan, if contracted.
Communication/Unblinding	Project Management	Working with LP, BPL to ensure URAF signed by client and stored on BTI study area before requesting access to unblinded BTI area.
Communication/Unblinding	Project Management	Ensure measures to minimize the risk of unintended unblinding are discussed and taken. Play Defense!
Study Assumptions Documents	Development	Consult with SR and Group lead whether to use the Study assumptions document. Collaborate with the BPL and LP to prepare a Study Assumptions document, as needed.
Resourcing	Project Management	Work with BPL to ensure adequate resourcing coverage, especially when the timeline is changed.
Access	Access	Work with BPL/LP to ensure appropriate access granted to staff supporting statistics related avtivities.
Safety Board Charter	Review - provide input	Review DSMB charter (or other safety board charter), if applicable.
Project Planning Checklist	Project Management	Collaborate closely with the BPL and LP to ensure the tasks and responsibilities are covered by team members qualified to perform a task, eg., using project planning checklist.

Development of a Deliverable
Topic	Category/Activity	Task
Discussion	Communication	Point of contact for the Client for any discussions on Statistical topics.
Internal Meetings	Project Management	Attend the Biostatistics project team meetings and meetings where Statistical methodologies are discussed, if budget allows.
Communication	Project Management	Support the BPL on aspects of Project Management that pertain to the Statistics side of the project, while taking full ownership of the statistical deliverables.
Project Planning Checklist	Project Management	Collaborate closely with the BPL and LP to ensure the tasks and responsibilities are covered by team members qualified to perform a task, eg., using project planning checklist.
Scope & Finance	Project Management	Identify potential budget overspends and raise issue to BPL.
Scope & Finance	Project Management	Proactively identify “out of scope” tasks and inform the BPL.
SDTM	Development	In discussion with LP or the DTS contact (If applicable), author or provide input into the Trial Design Domain Specifications.
SAP & Shells	Communication	Coordinate the project team review of SAP and shells revisions, if applicable.
Specifications	Communication	Discuss with BPL and LP on the responsibility of writing specifications and oversee process of creating the analysis database (ADB) and TLF programming specifications.
Specifications	Development	Authoring ADaM and TLF specifications if LS is responsible. 
Specifications	Development	Review specifications authored by another team member for consistency with the protocol and the statistical methodologies.
Specifications	Development	Schedule and lead a meeting to review analysis database and TLF programming specifications.
Specifications	Communication	Encourage the team members to ask questions and challenge the validity of the specifications and directives.
Specifications	Documentation	Work with LP to ensure a tag has been created with eforms filed after initial review of the ADaM and TLF Specifications took place. Repeat the steps for any substantial changes to the Specifications throughout the lifecycle of the study or delivery to the client.
Documentation	Documentation	Maintaining and ensuring that all project documents (SAP, Shells, Specs, etc.) are kept current on BTI with standard naming conventions.
SAP/Shell/Spec Comments	Communication	Work with LP to ensure previous comments addressed prior to start working on deliverable.
ADaM & TLF	Development	Working with the LP and SR to create the TLF cross check plan, if needed.
Inferential Statistics	Communication	Ensure inferential statistics strategy and process are discussed during the creation of the TLF specifications.
Inferential Statistics	Development	Ensure the programming, validation and review of inferential statistical analyses in accordance with the SAP and CRG SOPs.
ADaM & TLF	Review - provide input	Perform the initial review once ADBs and TLFs are developed and provide review comments to team.
Randomization	Review - provide input	Working with LP to ensure correct “Randomization Schedule” is being used.
Randomization	Review - provide input	Identification of any mis-randomizations or dispensing errors and addressing any effects on the analysis.
Data Issues	Communication	Work with LP to ensure that any data issues are being tracked and forwarded to Clinical Data Management/Clinical promptly.
SOPs	Communication	Ensure that the team follows all the standards, SOPs, Best practices pertain to the Statistics side of the project.
Documentation	Documentation	Work with LP and BPL to Keep and provide a log of client questions and their responses.
Monitoring	Communication	Working with BPL to monitor the event triggered deliverable, ie. DMC, IA, etc.
eTMF	Project Management	Email final documents to the PBL and BPL with appropriate information (type of document, version, description) once finalized.
DRM	Project Management	Scheduling and leading the Data Review Meeting (DRM) with the Client and attendees from needed CRG departments. Work with BPL on DRM meeting preparation and DRM meeting minutes.
Analysis Population	Communication	Ensuring that the Sponsor reviews all major protocol deviation listings and analysis sets at the time of the DRM.
Database Lock	Documentation	Working with BPL and LP to make sure all required documents are in place for database lock.
Database Lock	Communication	Give randomization team at least 2 weeks notification in advance of database lock date/Unblinded DMC/IA and provide all necessary documents in order to get actual randomization schedule after database lock.
Database Lock	Communication	Collaborate with LP to give early notification to IRT ahead of DB lock/Unblinded DMC/IA to get the IRT files. Typically need 1-month advance notice.
SAP	Documentation	Ensure SAP finalized and signed off prior to database lock.
Unblinding	Review - provide input	Working with Programming (or unblinded Statistician if applicable) to unblind/unmask the database and review unblinded treatment codes after database lock to ensure they are reported correctly.
Database Lock	Documentation	Signing off on the Database Finalization Form prior to database lock.
ADRG	Development	Prepare Analysis Data Reviewer's Guide (ADRG), if contracted.
Communication/Unblinding	Project Management	Working with LP, BPL to ensure URAF signed by client and stored on BTI study area before requesting access to unblinded BTI area.
CAPA	Communication	Support CAPA process for any process deviations during delivery to external/internal customers.
Project Management	Communication	Pro-active risk management and escalation.
Cross-functional/Client Meetings	Project Management	Support BPL in set up/conduct of both internal B&P and Client Meetings.
Scope & Finance	Communication	Work with BPL to ensure there is no outstanding ConMod on biostatistician related tasks.
Communication	Project Management	Regular engagement with support statisticians (support programmers). Ensure support statisticians are fully informed of ongoing study activities, available budget for specific tasks, expectations, timelines.
Training	Training	Assist BPL in ensuring project specific training and therapeutic area training (if applicable) are completed.
Project Management	Communication	Have regular discussions with the BPL and LP to ensure all ongoing tasks are on track.
Clarity	Project Management	Work with BPL, LP and PBL to ensure forecast of budgets and resource allocation is accurate in Clarity for statistics work, especially when the timeline is changed and/or SOW is changed.
Client Comments	Communication	Work with LP/BPL to ensure client comments and significant correspondence filed in BTI under appropratie folder.
Pinnacle 21	Review - provide input	Support LP with the resolution of ADaM Pinnacle 21 report comments and ADaM QC checks during key milestones, ensuring errors or warnings are addressed.
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Updates on Case Report Form (CRF), if applicable.
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Updates on Data Validation Manual (with Edit Checks), if applicable.
Data Management Documents	Review - provide input 	Review Updates on Data Transfer Specifications (DTS), if applicable.
Dabase Modification	Review - provide input	Review Database Modification request and specifications and evaluate potential impact on analysis.
Resourcing	Project Management	Work with BPL to ensure adequate resourcing coverage, especially when the timeline is changed and/or SOW is changed.
eCRT	Review - provide input	Review appropriate section of eCRT.
Scope & Finance	Project Management	Work with BPL/PBL to track study progress,  assess financial health, address risk aspect and attend meeting as needed.
Blinding Plan	Development	Create a blinding plan about how the study will be conducted to maintain treatment blinding throughout.
Protocol Deviation	Project Management	Participate in regular Protocol Deviation Review meetings. Review the periodic Protocol Deviations Listing and assign Bios severity code, as needed.
DMC	Communication	Work with Unblinded team, if applicable and Data Monitoring Committees (DMC) coordinator(s) to ensure requested outputs delivered to DMC member as per charter.
DMC	Communication	Work with DMC coordinator(s) to attend DMC Meetings and be prepared to answer questions about patient data and to explain interpretation of output during the meeting, if needed.
DMC	Communication	Work with BPL and Unblinded Statistical Lead to prepare for organisational meeting of the DMC.
Procedural Document Deviations	Project Management	Work with BPL/LP to document any intended or unintended SOP deviations, quality events, etc.

During Deliverable:
Topic	Category/Activity	Task
Communication	Project Management	Have regular discussions with the BPL and LP to ensure all ongoing tasks are on track.
Documentation	Documentation	Ensure SAP, shells, specs are updated as per deliverable findings and reviewed properly.
SAP/Shell/Spec Comments	Communication	Work with the LP to make sure that all previous comments are addressed properly prior to start working on the deliverable.
Communication	Project Management	Respond to programming questions in a timely manner to ensure accurate understanding of the specifications during ADB and TLF development.
ADaM & TLF	Review - provide input	Perform and/or coordinate review of the deliverables (ADBs and TLFs), ideally before Senior Review.
ADaM & TLF	Review - provide input	Pay close attention to the efficacy results to ensure they make statistical sense based on the analysis design.
Pinnacle 21	Review - provide input	Support LP with the resolution of ADaM Pinnacle 21 report comments and ADaM QC checks during key milestones, ensuring errors or warnings are addressed.
Meetings	Project Management	Schedule and lead a follow-up meeting after 1st round review with study team to identify potential programming or logic issues as needed.
Internal Review Comments	Communication	Work with the LP to make sure that all internal comments (eg. from LS/SR/Medical writer, etc.) are addressed.
Documentation	Project Management	Work with LP, SR to ensure eIRFs are completed.
Tracker	Project Management	Collaborate with LP and BPL to ensure outputs are identified in the tracker for each reviewer.
Data Issues	Project Management	Work with LP to ensure that any data issues are being tracked and forwarded to Clinical Data Management/Clinical promptly.
Cover Letter	Development	Work with LP, BPL to complete a cover letter describing the delivery and any relevant issues.
Communication	Project Management	Pro-active risk management and escalation.
Scope & Finance	Communication	Work with BPL to ensure there is no outstanding ConMod.
eTMF	Project Management	Email final documents to the PBL and BPL with appropriate information (type of document, version, description) once finalized.
Client Comments	Communication	Work with LP/BPL to ensure client comments filed in BTI under appropratie folder.
Documentation	Project Management	Work with LP/BPL to ensure all documents needed for the deliverable filed in BTI under appropriate folder.
Scope & Finance	Project Management	Proactively identify “out of scope” tasks and inform the BPL promptly.
Resourcing	Project Management	Work with BPL to ensure adequate resourcing coverage, especially when the timeline is changed and/or SOW is changed.
Communication	Project Management	Let SR know when documents are ready for SR review.
TLFs	Medical Writing 	Review the Final Biostatistics Deliverable Package for Medical Writing, if applicable.
Statistical Report	Review - provide input	Review the programmed narratives for the CSR, if applicable.

Close out:
Topic	Category/Activity	Task
Statistical Report	Review - provide input	CSR review and provide input and confirmations, if contracted.
Scope & Finance	Communication	Work with BPL to ensure there is no outstanding ConMod.
eTMF	Project Management	Work with LP, BPL to ensure all Expected Documents are filed in the project eTMF.
BTI	Archiving	Collaborate with LP to ensure project area is clean and all documentation is complete and ready for archival.

LS ROLE PPD:
Responsible for overseeing all aspects in the design and analysis of clinical trials
LS will be the point of contact for the Client for any discussions on Statistical topics
Supports the BPL on Project Management aspects while taking full ownership of the statistical deliverables 
Collaborates closely with the BPL and LP to ensure the tasks and responsibilities are covered by team members qualified to perform a task
Encourages the statisticians/medical writers/senior reviewers/programmers to ask questions and challenge the validity of the specifications and directives
LS will be identified as “Bios/Prog - Lead Statistician (LS)” in Clarity
A LS can also cover the BPL role if the required skillset, availability and interest is there

Randomization:
This page includes a high level overview of Randomization and then detailed information for B&P Teams, EDS Teams, IRT, CRG and anyone else requesting a Randomization Schedule from the CRG Randomization Team.
Visit the Table of Contents to see the content relevant for your role.
Patient Randomization Schedules provide the treatment assignments. Materials/Kit Randomization Schedules provide the drug kit assignments.
With a randomized study, proper handling and maintenance of this confidential randomization information is critical if that study involves "blinding" of the project team members.
Blinding is the process that ensures that applicable project team members do not know which participants are receiving a particular treatment.
Blinding is done to ensure that no bias is introduced by the knowledge of the treatment assigned to the subjects.
Depending on the study's design and objectives it may be necessary to keep any combination of the investigators, subjects, and project team members blinded throughout its completion.
In a double-blind study everyone is blinded unless they have an unblinded role on the study;
in a single-blind study either the investigator or the subject is aware of treatment;
and in an open-label study everyone is unblinded.
However: At times, our clients choose to remain blinded to the randomization of an open-label or single-blind study, or request the study team to remain blinded.
Surrogate or “Dummy” Schedules are generated solely for structural review prior to generation of the Actual Schedule and do not contain “real” treatment assignment.
Random seeds are then changed to generate the Actual Schedules with access restricted to unblinded team members.
Read on to understand our CRG randomization process:

Who to Contact
For New Randomization Requests: Contact Randomization Request (SM) and provide as much of the required information as possible. Early notice will help ensure a randomization team can be assigned, even if ahead of time and all information is not yet available.
Note for Response Adaptive Randomization, a different process is followed - See Response Adaptive Randomization for details and contact the randomization team for input asap.
Similarly if study/program is a Master Protocol/Platform Trial/Umbrella Trial, contact the randomization team for input asap.
For EDS studies, if RTSM Randomization will be used, then a different process is followed. More details coming soon. Other EDS studies follow the process detailed below.
For Current/Ongoing Study Specific Randomization Questions: Contact the study specific Randomization team via DL-all Bios Client Studynickname Randomization. This ensures everyone is included on significant communication especially if a rand lead is OOTO and a backup needs to provide coverage. Ensure there is at least one person in the DL as the randomization team have to revoke their access on a regular basis.

Required Information
For randomization requests, copy and paste the below into an email. Alternatively, download a copy from here. Add answers and then send to RandomizationRequest.SM@ppd.com with Subject Line “Randomization Request - SPONSOR -PROTOCOL NUMBER (BC#)”.

GENERAL (Rand Team will copy these details to Rand Team Planner and use this information to resource a rand team (RS, RQV, Rand SR (if applicable) and their backups)
Question	Answer
1. Is it a new randomization or an update/amendment/resupply to an existing Schedule?

2. Does this study require a Patient Randomization and Materials/Kit Schedule? (Note: Materials/Kit Schedule will likely drive the timelines (usually required up to 6 months before First Patient In (FPI) to allow time for labelling and printing) so if this is unknown please follow up as a priority. If the IRT vendor is Signant Health then the actual schedule tends to be needed 2 months prior to FPI, so again please follow up as a priority.)

3. Is the protocol final? If not, when is the finalized protocol expected? (Note, sponsor approval via email is required to proceed with draft protocol, as any changes could affect the randomization and the sponsor would be responsible for costs incurred)

4. If open label (with no blinding restrictions), does the sponsor or vendor require the creation of both a Surrogate Schedule and an Actual Schedule? Are there any restrictions on who should receive the Actual Schedule?

5. Is it a Phase I/Early Development Services (EDS) study? If yes, are blind breaking envelopes required?

6. BTI area:

Timeline:
Question	Answer
7. Date Surrogate Schedule(s) required:

8. Date Actual Schedule(s) required:

9. First Patient In (FPI) Date:

Key Contact Info:
Question	Answer
10. Key Bios Contact Name and role on study (e.g. BPL, LS or Resourcing Manager):

11. Project Lead:

12. Name and contact details for CRG/vendor IRT lead and backup(s):
Note that if there is no CRG IRT oversight, escalate with IRT vendor/client to determine what is the vendor approval process and who will be reconciling/approving as the rand team does not go into vendor systems. Rand team can only provide programmatic compare of exported file from the IRT vendor and compare to the Actual schedule provided.

13. Name and contact details for CRG GCS/Sponsor GCS/Packaging vendor representatives and backup(s):

14. Name and contact details for Sponsor Representative(s) reviewing randomization and who will approve the Randomization (No more than 4 reviewers and 2 approvers, if possible):

Note that if the Sponsor does not wish to review and approve the Randomization, this will need to be documented in an email from the Sponsor.

This email should state that the Sponsor waives their right to review and approve the RSAF (Randomization Specification and Authorization Form) and surrogate (dummy) randomization schedule(s), and the Sponsor acknowledges that the actual (unblinded “real/live”) schedule(s) will be generated following email approval by the PPD internal team and any applicable vendors.

This email should be filed in the BTI study area.

15. Our standard is to provide the Surrogate and Actual randomization package in a password protected WinZip file via email. If Sponsor and/or vendors require alternate delivery method, please specify and work to set this up as it can take additional time:

SPECIFICS (Information which will be required to complete the RSAF and Schedule(s). Answers not required at time of requesting a randomization team but will be needed prior to completing RSAF)
IRT (Interactive Response Technology):
Question	Answer
16. Are IRT specifications available? If not, can a screenshot of the treatment id, treatment descriptions and stratification factors (if applicable) be provided via email?

17. Block size will be blinded in the RSAF and Sponsor output by default. Please advise if the Sponsor would instead like to know the block size:

18. If there was a previous randomization, check the REC_NUM, BLOCK, RAND_NUM and/or KIT_NUM starting numbers as they may need to pick up where the previous Schedule left off, and please provide details:

19. We will generate PDF output for Sponsor and CSV (with header rows) for IRT. If any other output format is needed by the Sponsor or any vendors, please specify:

GCS (Global Clinical Supplies):
Question	Answer
20. Please provide the treatment ids and descriptions to be used in the Material/Kit Schedule (e.g. A=Drug XYZ 200mg, B=Drug XYZ 400mg, C=Placebo):
Please confirm alignment with IRT and Packaging Vendor, as needed:

21. Material/Kit number variable length (e.g. kit 10001=5):

22. Number of kits required overall and per treatment (e.g. treatment 1 = 20,000; treatment 2 = 30,000; treatment 3 = 10,000; total kits = 60,000):

23. We will output the Materials/Kit Schedule with shuffled kit numbers and sorted by treatment. If Schedule needs to be sorted different, please specify:

24. Will kits need to be reserved for specific drug periods?

25. We will generate PDF output for Sponsor and CSV (with header rows) for IRT and Packaging vendor. If any other output format is needed by the Sponsor or any vendors, please specify:

Timelines
Discuss randomization timelines at KOM (Kick Off Meeting) or as soon as the study is awarded (whichever comes first) with:

Sponsor
CRG IRT / IRT vendor
CRG GCS / Packaging / Labeling vendor (if applicable, i.e., of scope of work includes Materials/Kit Schedule)
Allow a minimum of 4 weeks from the creation of RSAF and the generation of the Surrogate Schedule(s) to delivery of the Actual Schedule(s). This timeline does not include the development period for RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s).
For standard timelines, please see: B&P Timeline Template which are also summarized below. EDS studies do not use the B&P Timeline Template, but the below timeline summary can be used as a guide.

NOTE: If this is an urgent randomization, please give the randomization team as much notice as possible, even if all details are not known at that point, and mark as URGENT

7 days for CRG internal review/approval
3 days for client/vendor review/comments or approval
2 days for incorporation of client/vendor comments (if applicable)
3 days for CRG internal review/approval
1 day for updated client/vendor approval
4 days for Actual generation/review/distribution
Internal Team and Required Access
Once assigned, the full internal team and backups should be included in all email communication. Responsibilities are detailed below.

Each Randomization Team member must have at least one designated and comparably qualified backup. Assignments are made in Planner based on timelines and availability. Randomization Team members must not serve as blinded project team members for studies in which they are identified as part of the Randomization Team for double-blind studies, as well as open-label and single-blind studies treated as double-blind studies.

For BPL, LS, Resourcing Manager or other team member requesting BTI access:
Use the BTI Change Requestor to request READ access to the main study area for the assigned Rand Team (RS, Rand SR (if applicable), RQV and backups), and LEAD access to the _R study area (NOT _U as this is for the unblinded team). See Creating a Randomization or Unblinded Study Area for further details.

BFT ExclamationMark.png
NOTE: To set up a new project area, see Study Naming Process and Conventions.
Once _R access has been granted, the study specific randomization team (RS, Rand SR (if applicable), RQV and backups) can then be contacted via DL-all Bios Client Studynickname Randomization.

Responsibilities for B&P Studies
Role	RSAF	Surrogate Schedule(s)	Surrogate Deliverable Package	Actual Schedule(s)	Actual Deliverable Package
RS
(Randomization Statistician)	Create
or
Review and Approve	Create	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve	Create	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve
RQV
(Randomization Quality Validator)	Create
or
Review and Approve	Review and Approve	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve	Review and Approve	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve
Rand SR
(Randomization Senior Reviewer)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve			
CRG IRT
(if applicable)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve			
CRG GCS
(if applicable)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve (Material/Kit only)			
Note: There is no requirement for the B&P Team to be involved in the creation or review of the RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s), but the B&P Team can choose to perform an additional review on top of the formal reviews detailed above.
Responsibilities for EDS Studies
Role	RSAF	Surrogate Schedule(s)	Surrogate Deliverable Package	Actual Schedule(s)	Actual Deliverable Package
LS	Create	Create	Create and Deliver		
SR
(must be Senior Statistician or above)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve			
RS
(Randomization Statistician)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve		Create	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve
RQV
(Randomization Quality Validator)	Review and Approve	Review and Approve	Review and Approve	Review and Approve	Create and Deliver
or
Review and Approve
Note: For open-label studies with no blinding restrictions, then the LS may Create the Actual Schedule(s) and the RS would Review and Approve in addition to the RQV.
CRG IRT Expectations
IRT will help gather the requirements detailed here and are involved in reviewing the RSAF (Distribution, Randomization and Materials_Kit tabs), Patient Randomization Schedule and Materials/Kit Schedule. Backup IRT team members should be identified to ensure adequate coverage. There are different levels of involvement expected dependent on whether and how vendors are being used:

CRG IRT is contracted and completes review and approval during Surrogate Internal Review
CRG IRT is contracted, but outsourced to an approved Third-Party Vendor (TPV) - CRG IRT PM will be involved in the Internal Review and provide comments, but there is no expectation for CRG IRT approval
CRG IRT is not contracted, client approved TPV completes review and approval after Surrogate Internal Review completed
Option 2 is the most common approach. After the Internal Review has been completed, the RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s) will be sent by the RS to the TPV. CRG IRT should not be sending the RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s) to the TPV. The CRG IRT team will be included (in cc) on the email to the TPV. The TPV will be required to review and send any comments and/or approval via email. Once the RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s) approval has been received from the TPV (via email) and Client (via RSAF) and the Actual Schedule(s) have been created, these will be sent to the TPV with CRG IRT PM on copy. In some cases, the TPV may ask for the IRT specifications (e.g., User Requirements Specification (URS)) to be approved, this task will be completed by the RS.

If B&P or the Randomization Team are asked to check anything in the TPV IRT system via logging into their system – we DO NOT do this and must push back to the TPV and escalate to Katy Tam. CRG IRT has agreed to do this check within the system. We also DO NOT do a manual check. The only thing we might do is a programmatic review, if necessary, which is limited to only the variables included in the Actual Schedule(s) that we provided, i.e., no additional variables that the vendor may have added after receiving our Actual Schedule(s) will be reviewed. Only CSV or Excel files should be provided to CRG Randomization Team for this programmatic review. The following email text can be tweaked as necessary and used to document approval: "I have programmatically compared the exported file you provided (put name of file xxxxxx) with our actual randomization file sent to you for upload on ddmmmyyyy (put name of file xxxxxx). I have compared the variables present in both files xxx, xxx, xxx, xxx and all variables matched. Attached is the signed form for your records."

CRG IRT leads should also support any questions or concerns coming from study teams regarding IRT data imports from vendors.

CRG GCS Expectations
GCS will help gather the requirements detailed here and are involved in reviewing the RSAF (Distribution and Materials_Kit tabs) and Materials/Kit Schedule. There are different levels of involvement expected dependent on whether and how vendors are being used. Further details on this coming soon! Backup GCS team members should be identified to ensure adequate coverage.

PROCEDURES 

Documents will be filed per Biostatistics Project Management and Documentation (SOP-17020) and Management of Project Documentation in PPD’s eTMF (SOP-17209), if using CRG’s 

electronic Trial Master File(eTMF). 

1.0 Create and Review the Randomization Specification and Authorization Form 
(RSAF) and Surrogate Schedule(s) 

1.1 The LS: 
1.1.1 Gathers all needed information for the RSAF, drafts the RSAF, and 
creates the surrogate schedule(s). 
1.1.2 Provides the draft RSAF and surrogate schedule(s) to the Internal Review Team. 
1.2 The Internal Review Team: 

Note: At a minimum, the Internal Review Team must consist of RS, 
Randomization Quality Validator (RQV), and Senior Reviewer (SR). The 
Internal Review Team may have additional members, as necessary.
1.2.1 Review the initial and each revised version of the RSAF and surrogate 
schedule(s).
1.2.2 Provide email approval for the final versions of the RSAF and surrogate 
schedule(s). 
1.3 The LS revises the draft RSAF and surrogate schedule(s), if applicable, and 
repeats the review cycle until agreement is obtained from all internal reviewers. 
1.4 The RQV ensures email approval has been obtained from all internal team 
members. 

2.0 Initial Distribution and Approval of RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s) 

2.1 The LS: 
2.1.1 As part of any necessary packaging, ensures that conversions and/or 
encryption according to Acceptable Use of Technologies (SOP-16957) are applied. 
2.1.2 Ensures the deliverable package is quality validated. 
2.1.3 Receives approval from RQV that the RSAF and Surrogate 
Randomization package is ready for delivery to the Client and Vendors (as applicable).
2.1.4 Using the two applicable electronic Deliverable Validation Forms 
(eDVFs), certifies that the surrogate schedule(s) have been appropriately 
reviewed and approved and the deliverable package has been validated. 
2.1.5 Distributes to the Client and Vendors (as applicable) for review and 
approval. 
2.1.6 Verifies that all external approval(s) have been received. 
2.1.7 Files the external approval(s) in the project area and notifies the 
Randomization Team that required approval(s) have been received. 

Note: If requested updates to the RSAF and/or surrogate schedules are 
requested by the Client or Vendor, the above procedures are repeated 
until approval is obtained. Minor text and cosmetic updates to the RSAF 
(e.g., addition of team members to distribution, grammatical updates) 
can be reviewed and approved by the RQV instead of requiring full 
internal team review and approval.
3.0 Generating Actual Schedule(s) 

Notes: 
• The project team members may generate the actual schedule for open-label and 
single-blind instances, as defined above, and follow the RS role, as outlined in 
Sections 3.0 – 4.0; however, the RS will still provide review and approval. 
• For single-blind or open-label trials where a surrogate schedule was not required (per Client request), the steps described below apply to the schedule(s).
3.1 The RS: 
3.1.1 After receiving notification of required external approval(s), changes the 
program seed value, and generates the actual schedule(s) by the same 
means as the surrogate schedule(s). 
3.1.2 Ensures the seed value is at least a seven (7) digit randomly selected 
integer and is not based on the computer clock. 
3.1.3 Generates the actual schedule(s), as applicable, in the randomization area 
with restricted access, limited to the Randomization Team. 
3.1.4 Ensures the actual schedule(s) are clearly and correctly identified. 
3.2 The RQV: 
3.2.1 Reviews the actual schedule(s). 
3.2.2 Provides approval to the RS for the actual schedule(s). 
3.2.3 Verifies that all required documentation is present in the related 
project/randomization area. 

4.0 Initial Distribution of the Actual Schedule(s) 

4.1 The RS: 
4.1.1 Appropriately protects randomization information, as per Acceptable Use 
of Technologies (SOP-16957) and the Secure Data Transmission
Guidelines, obtains Client approval for distribution, and distributes to 
unblinded individuals approved to receive, as noted on the RSAF. 
4.1.2 Receives approval from RQV that the Actual Randomization package is 
ready for delivery to the unblinded recipients, per the RSAF. 
4.1.3 Using the two applicable eDVFs, certifies that the actual schedule(s) have been appropriately reviewed and approved and the deliverable package 
has been validated. 
4.1.4 Ensures randomization documentation is filed in the project/randomization area. 

5.0 Modifications to Existing Schedule(s) 

5.1 The LS: 
5.1.1 Obtains Client authorization and instructions for modifying the 
schedule(s), with a clearly stated rationale for changes and differentiation 
of the modified specifications relative to the original specifications. 
5.1.2 Prepares the revisions to the RSAF and schedule(s) and follows the 
instructions in Sections 1.0 – 4.0 for review and approval.
6.0 Distributing Randomization Information After Initial Release 

6.1 The Project Team Member Requesting Randomization Information provides 
instructions for distribution of randomization information including, when 
applicable, Client authorization, as documented on the Biostatistics Unblinding 
Randomization Request Form (URAF) and other documentation, as necessary 
(see Management of Study Unblinding [SOP-17016]). 

Note: The requirement for Client authorization may be waived, in accordance with 
SOP-17020, on the Study Startup Client Agreement Form. 

6.2 The RS or RQV releases randomization information, as directed and authorized 
by completed documentation above. 

7.0 Randomization File Requirements 

7.1 If the study has blinding restrictions (e.g., double-blind, open-label/single-blind 
with Client directive to have themselves or other project team members remain 
blinded to the randomization), the RQV ensures the actual randomization 
documentation is maintained in the randomization area by the Randomization 
Team members. 
7.2 The LS: 
7.2.1 Maintains the randomization files/documentation in the project area. 
7.2.2 Ensures the following are filed:
Request for randomization, with Client approval (RSAF) 
• Approval of the RSAF and surrogate schedule(s) from internal 
reviewers 
• The surrogate schedule(s) used for review. 
• Documentation (e.g., program logs) of the method used to generate the surrogate randomization and/or materials/kit schedules. 
• Documentation of modification request(s), modifications implemented to existing schedule(s), and approved RSAF for any modification(s) 
• After study unblinding or if an open label study, the actual schedule(s). 
7.3 The RQV ensures the following are filed in the Randomization Area: 
• The actual schedule(s) 
• Approval of actual schedule(s) from internal reviewer(s) 
• Documentation (e.g., program/seed logs) of the method used to 
generate the actual schedule(s)
8.0 Randomization File for Study Unblinding/Finalization 

8.1 The RS or RQV ensures all documentation is transferred electronically to the 
project team to perform unblinding.

When you have read through this Job Aid, you should be able to:

Create the Randomization Specification and Authorization Form (RSAF)

Introduction	
The RS or RQV will cover the generation of the RSAF, working in the Documents folder in the _R area.

For EDS studies, the RSAF is an LS responsibility.

Preparation
Step	Procedure
   1.	Copy RSAF template from SOP-17018 (legacy BST 04) to User\Trunk\Documents\Randomization or \Trunk\Documents when working in the _R area.
BFT StopSign.png
Please remember to use the current version of the RSAF attached to the SOP, i.e. do not copy from another study.
   2.	Revise the template as applicable per the study or program requirements. See details of items to consider below.
Remember that the RSAF is just a template so if a client wants to use their forms (this is very rare) then it’s possible to modify ours or use theirs alongside ours.

BFT StopSign.png
Please make sure you understand the study design prior to generating the RSAF.
   3.	
BFT StopSign.png
Be sure to Enable Macros to get full RSAF functionality.
Cover Page
Check	Detail
   1.	Ensure the Client and protocol details are consistent with the protocol, and are being carried through to the header of every tab in the RSAF.
   2.	Check Lawson code/BC number gives what is needed to find the study on Time Card
   3.	The tabs in the file will change based on if "No" or "Yes" is selected for Dynamic Minimization Randomization.
   4.	Put "N/A" as the delivery date as applicable, e.g. if no surrogate being delivered or if RSAF only applies to one of the Patient Randomization or Materials/Kit Schedules.
   5.	Randomization Administration
For phase 2-4 should be “IRT System”
For EDS this is generally “Site/pharmacist list will use list”
   6.	Location before unblinding should be _R area, unless EDS open label study with no blinding restrictions. After Unblinding should be …Trunk\Databases\Randomization\OutputBe careful with wilbtia vs wilbtib in location paths. E.g. wilbtib/wilbtib04 not wilbtia/wilbtib04.
   7.	Update the version # in cell A33. Version # would be updated in minor revisions (Version 1.x) following delivery to the client (no changes to version number required based on internal review), if there are back and forth discussions that update the document (prior to sign-off). If changes are made to the RSAF post-sign-off then it becomes a major revision number (Version 2). Ensure the version number is carried through to the footer of every tab in the RSAF.
**Note: RSAF and surrogate schedule versions may not match. There may be an update to the RSAF such as added recipient that causes a change in version, but surrogate rand will stay at version 1 (surr01) with a RSAF v1.1.
   8.	
If Patient Randomization and Materials/Kit Schedules are to be generated separately (due to timelines), then ensure this is clear in the Version (e.g. Version 1 Materials/Kit Only) and Comments fields.

   9.	
Update the Comments with details of the protocol version and date. (Note, sponsor approval via email is required to proceed with draft protocol, as any changes could affect the randomization and the sponsor would be responsible for costs incurred)

   10.	If there is something unusual for the study (such as double-randomization) or something unusual about the schedules (i.e., double-sequence number, unusual starting value for sequence number, etc.), add that information to the Comments area and explain the 'why' if the unusual aspect is in regards to the schedule content.
If it is a replacement or additional schedule use the text “This replacement will replace and supersede…” or “This replacement will be used in addition to…” as applicable.

For open label studies with no blinding restrictions, where only an Actual is generated and no surrogate, make sure there is some sentence that says something of the sort “This open-label Actual Randomization, once reviewed and approved will act as the Actual Randomization for the study”.

   11.	Modification log: Add in details of what changed from one version to the other for the RSAF and schedules.
Distribution
Check	Detail
   1.	Populate the names, contact details and functions (does not have to be the person's title) of recipients of the RSAF:
White section for blinded recipients of the Surrogate Schedule(s)
Yellow section for unblinded recipients of the Actual Schedule(s)
Use 'Y' if the individual is to receive the associated schedule, 'N' if the individual is not to receive the associated schedule or 'N/A' if schedule is not generated. Include the format of the associated schedule (PDF, CSV, SAS dataset, etc.).

EDS (if applicable) and Randomization team should receive "All Available Formats".

CRG IRT (if applicable) should receive both Patient Randomization and Materials/Kit schedule in the same format as the associated vendor. CRG GCS (if applicable) should receive Materials/Kit schedule in the same format as the associated vendor. PDF and CSV are provided to vendors and clients as standard.

Biostatistics (if applicable) should receive SAS dataset.

Ensure back-up team members are included wherever possible. Project Lead should not be included.

   2.	
For non-CRG recipients of schedules, provide the team "proof" of the e-mail addresses. This can be copies of e-mails, communication plan, etc. This is needed for verification that the e-mail addresses are correct given a) it is easy to have a typo when entering the e-mail addresses on the RSAF form and b) it is imperative that the correct recipients receive the schedule(s).

   3.	Ensure Unblinded section does not include any blinded project team members or others that look like they do not belong.
   4.	For EDS studies:
There are several (Austin, Miami, Las Vegas) CRG Clinics Pharmacy groups (e.g., auscln_parm@ppdi.com) which should always be on the EDS RSAF as people receiving the schedule if using CRG Pharmacy services.
If not using CRG Pharmacy services, check if there is a DL that should be used for the pharmacy, to avoid only having a single recipient.
Do not send surrogate to sites, just the actual. It does not matter if client chooses to review a different format, as we cross check all versions internally.
IRT may be used but many times not because of how fast setup is needed and therefore sites handle themselves and will use the Blind Breaking envelopes along with the electronic Actual list. In this case the envelope labels need to be created and saved in BTI. Envelopes currently done and checked by Brooke and Kim in the Wilmington office. Query if it’s not mentioned. Also make sure physical mailing address is provided for envelopes. Only send envelopes to those who will potentially need them (usually one site, if not question how it will be handled). Aim for envelopes delivery in time for FPI, so consider where they are being sent to, i.e. non NA will take longer.
   5.	
Populate the Additional Delivery Instructions as applicable for your study. There should be detailed instructions on how the Surrogate and Actual deliverables will be sent (e.g., encrypted zip via email which is most common or posting to a server or mailed). If working with CRG GCS, check if PDF requires RQV signature on the first page of the PDF Actual Schedule, and if yes ensure this is detailed in the delivery instructions.

   6.	
If an externally controlled secure server is to be used for delivery of the Actual Schedule(s), include the text "Where a secured server is used and is controlled outside of PPD, it is the responsibility of the owner of the secured server to ensure the correct unblinded team member(s) have access to the secured server."

Randomization
Check	Detail
Will display when Dynamic Minimization Randomization is "No" and Randomization Schedule/List Required is "Yes" on Cover Page, i.e. for Fixed Schedules
   1.	Make sure Design matches protocol (parallel, crossover, etc.)
   2.	Number of Randomization Numbers on Schedule - To determine the # of records needed, multiply the # of randomized subjects expected in the study times the number of stratification combinations. If there is no stratification within the schedule, still include extra records (double the # of randomized subjects). This will result in more records than needed but greatly reduces the likelihood of needing an additional schedule because of running out of records.
If replacement randomization numbers are applicable, include number of replacement randomization numbers with a note.

   3.	Block Size - Be sure to ask the client if they wish to know Block Size as some clients want to remain blinded. If this is the case, do not include the block variables in the RSAF or Schedule(s) to be delivered to the client, ensure this is clear in the RSAF note and write a Note to file (NTF) that is stored on BTI that contains block information. Regardless of this, 'Block' variables also tend to be removed from the PDF output that goes to site for EDS studies.
Determining Block - Check makes sense vs number of subjects and treatments. Normally double the number of treatments, and sufficient to work for the treatment ratio (e.g. 2 treatments in 2:1 ratio, then would need block size of 6 not 4). Small block size (e.g. 2 for 1:1 ratio) risks unblinding, large block size risks incomplete blocks causing treatment imbalance. For example, 3:1 treatment ratio would generally be a block of 4 or 8, though larger blocks can create imbalance.

We do try to limit the knowledge of the block size. However, we do require sponsor approval of the randomization schedule - including the RSAF and Surrogate Schedule(s) and it is true that whoever reviews, will know the block size if it is not blinded. The reason we limit knowledge of block size is to limit the ability of persons involved in the study to guess treatments. For double-blind studies, this is important so as not to bias assessments during the trial. For open-label studies, it is even more important so that future treatment assignments cannot be guessed and bias enrolment.

   4.	Site Stratification - If Site is a stratification factor, select "IRT" if IRT is dynamically allocating site to a randomization block. Select "Randomization Schedule" if the randomization schedule will be pre-allocated with site references. Preallocating site reference on the schedule needs to be avoided.
   5.	Other Stratification Factors - If there are stratification factors other than site,
select "IRT - Please refer to IRT specs for details on stratification" if IRT is dynamically allocating non-site stratification factors to a randomization block. Often in these cases STRAT & STRAT_TX are still included in the dataset but are left blank. A note should be added for this. This way the RSAF doesn’t need to be updated if the stratification changes.
Select "Randomization Schedule" if the randomization schedule will be pre-allocated with non-site stratification factors.
If some stratification factors will be dynamically allocated by the IRT and some stratification factors will be pre-allocated on the schedule, select "Other".
Where possible, the preference is for stratification to be handled dynamically within IRT for efficiency, but this is dependent on vendors. Currently, 4G handle dynamic stratification at no cost (empty stratification variables should be included), but Suvoda and Signant Health require rand team to preallocate or include within our rand schedule.

   6.	The Stratification table is only populated if the randomization schedule will have non-site stratification factors pre-allocated on the schedule. For example: Gender with Stratification Levels of Male, Female; Age Category with Stratification Levels of 18-45 yrs, >45 yrs. Details of the strata number and description should be included, included combined stratification if applicable. For example: STRAT 1 has STRAT_TX of Male, 18-45 yrs; STRAT 2 has STRAT_TX of Male, >45 yrs; STRAT 3 has STRAT_TX of Female, 18-45 yrs; STRAT 4 has STRAT_TX of Female, >45 yrs;
Don’t have too many stratification factors and associated levels compared to the number of subjects to be randomized in the clinical trial. Having too many stratification factors and levels not only increases the risk of treatment imbalance but also increases the risk of not having enough subjects in each stratification factor level to be able to determine statistical significance.

   7.	). Ask for a snippet from the IRT specs if not finalized so we can match treatment codes and descriptions and stratification if needed and ask if length of rand num e.g. 1001 is acceptable. If IRT specs are not ready at time of review, need to make sure the IRT specs will match EXACTLY what is in the Randomization schedule. If treatments A & B are used make sure the actual treatment labels are detailed beneath the treatments table.
   8.	For EDS studies:
The client may suggest updates not matching or included in protocol. Double check if any of the changes will require an amendment to the protocol.
Dose levels are not often included in case they change but need to ensure in the comments that it’s documented where this information is recorded.
   9.	Randomization Variables - Remove any variables not to be used in the schedule or update using exact requested label if client/vendor wants something different from our template variables/labels. NOTE: if this is an updated or replacement schedule, please ask IRT if REC_NUM, RAND_NUM, BLK_NUM need to start from where the previous schedule left off.
Generally for EDS studies since the PDF goes to the site we remove BLOCK and BLOCK SIZE from PDF output and then put “*” beside them in table and a note below the table that says Block and Block Size are removed from the PDF.

   10.	The File Format(s) section should have formats check marked based on the format(s) required by recipients of the Surrogate and/or Actual Schedule(s). This should match the format details in the Distribution tab. "SAS dataset", "CSV" and "PDF" should be checked as standard.
Dynamic Rand
Check	Detail
Will display when Dynamic Minimization Randomization is "Yes" and Randomization Schedule/List Required is "Yes" on Cover Page, i.e. for Dynamic Minimization Randomization Schedules
   1.	Number of Random Values on Schedule is to be populated with the number of records that should exist on the random number list.
   2.	Sequential Counter is to be populated with 1 unless the schedule is being created to add additional records to an existing schedule. For example, if original adaptive randomization schedule had record IDs of 1-1000 the Sequential Counter for the additional records would start at 1001.
   3.	Sample Random Value is populated with an example of what the random number would look like (between 0 and 1). For example, if the value should have 8 digits post-decimal the value could be 0.12345678
   4.	The File Format(s) section should have formats check marked based on the format(s) required by recipients of the Surrogate and/or Actual Schedule(s). This should match the format details in the Distribution tab. "SAS dataset", "CSV" and "PDF" should be checked as standard.
Materials_Kit
Check	Detail
Will display when Materials/Kit Schedule Required is "Yes" on Cover Page (Unlikely for EDS studies, unless IRT is being used)
   1.	Note that the RAND_NUM and KIT_NUM need to be of a different number length to avoid any potential confusion. (e.g., RAND_NUM 1001 and KIT_NUM 10001).
   2.	If this is an updated or replacement schedule, check if REC_NUM and KIT_NUM need to start from where the previous schedule left off.
   3.	Sort by Treatment and Shuffle Kit as standard, unless requested to do otherwise.
   4.	Determining the amount of Kits needed. Note that it is better to generate more than not enough. We do not want to do resupply schedules if it is not needed as this is additional cost to the client and time by the team. The amount of kits should be the number of kits per subject during the study multiplied by the number of subjects (if each treatment arms have the same number of kits). Discuss with IRT, GCS and any vendors to make sure it syncs up with their expectations.
   5.	The File Format(s) section should have formats check marked based on the format(s) required by recipients of the Surrogate and/or Actual Schedule(s). This should match the format details in the Distribution tab. "SAS dataset", "CSV" and "PDF" should be checked as standard.
   6.	The Kits To Be Reserved for Specific Study Periods is only populated if kits are to be reserved for specific study periods.
Unless there is something unusual regarding the kit number, differences in quantities of kits per material type, particular ranges for particular material types, etc. additional clarifications are not needed. If there is anything unusual then that needs to be clarified in the Comments section on the Cover Page tab.

Unblinding
Check	Detail
   1.	The Method section will be based on how unblinding will occur in the study (not regulatory unblinding where sites are unaware unblinding has occurred). The Comments section is only completed if "Other" is selected as the unblinding method. Make sure the project team/client have the discussion prior to randomization development on who will handle individual subject unblinding. The CRG Randomization Team DOES NOT handle individual subject unblindings.
There may be detail in the protocol as to what should go here. Phase 2-4 most will be ”IRT”, but for EDS it is generally standard text from the protocol with mention of unblinding envelopes (in which case labels need to be created and saved in BTI). For truly Open Label studies with no blinding restrictions, put in the Comments “N/A Open-Label Study”

Approvals
Check	Detail
   1.	Check who will be the client approver, note that if a second client approver is included then that signature is no longer optional.
Note that if the Sponsor does not wish to review and approve the Randomization, this will need to be documented in an email from the Sponsor.

This email should state that the Sponsor waives their right to review and approve the RSAF (Randomization Specification and Authorization Form) and surrogate (dummy) randomization schedule(s), and the Sponsor acknowledges that the actual (unblinded “real/live”) schedule(s) will be generated following email approval by the PPD internal team and any applicable vendors.

This email should be filed in the BTI study area.

   2.	The internal approver will be the assigned RQV.
Finalizations Ready for Schedule Generation
Step	Procedure
   1.	Review the RSAF for accuracy (including spelling and formatting) and completeness. Make sure any red informational text from the RSAF template is either removed if N/A or made black if is applicable. Check via Print Preview for any truncation or paging issues as important will be correct when printed to pdf for DocuSign.
   2.	SVN Commit the RSAF.
   3.	Move on to production of the Surrogate Schedule(s) per Job Aid - Randomization - Surrogate Schedule


   ADaM best practices
Jump to navigationJump to search
	This Certified Content has been reviewed by the CDISC ADaM solution team for accuracy.
This document outlines some key recommendations based on common issues regarding Certified Content.pngADaM and guidance derived from the most recent version of the ADaM Implementation Guide (Version 1.1 released 12 Feb 2016).

What version of ADaM to use and whether the selection is acceptable to submission agencies should be discussed with the client at study startup and should include consultation with the latest version of the FDA Technical Standards Catalog. For changes between versions of the implementation guide, check the modification log in the document appendices.

Please consider these items as best practice for PPD and employ them where appropriate.


Contents
1	Specifications
2	Datasets
3	Variables
3.1	General
3.2	Dates/times
4	Analysis Data Subject Level (ADSL)
5	Basic Data Structure (BDS)
6	OCCDS (Occurrence Data Structure)
7	ADAM OTHER class
8	Controlled Terminology
9	Additional
10	Contact
11	References
Specifications
Utilize Excel ADaM spec template attached to SOP-17024.
For teams that are not utilizing PPD's standard ADB template noted above, please contact the ADaM & DoD Solution Team in regards to generating the ADaM define.xml as additional action will be required.
Never copy an ADaM spec from another study, always download a new copy of the template from the SOP for every new project.
ADB reference files:
Any external file used in your ADB development, such as look up datasets or spreadsheets
Files should be saved as SAS xpt or SAS dataset compatible with SAS xpt v5 format for linking with the eCRT
All reference file names must be lower case and cannot contain any spaces – as separators utilize "-" dashes. Also, ensure no special wildcards are included such as "@, %, #"
Variables in the spec should be listed in the desired dataset output order.
When assigning the variable Source, the conventions proposed from the ADaM Metadata team should be followed.
Additionally per CDISC, "it is allowable to have multiple sources for a single ADaM, however SRCDOM applies to which source is used directly for AVAL and at this time only one SRCDOM is available to use for a single source for a single record. This variable would not be used for a derived row that contained information from multiple sources."
Derivation instructions should be in plain English without SAS code or pseudo-code.
When writing derivations, consider how missing values are handled.
The Define on Demand and ADaM Solution teams should be consulted if using a different specification template, since this will have downstream impacts on the generation of ADaM define.xml using Define on Demand.
Review of specifications by appropriate team members (as indicated in SOP BST-06) preferably should occur before any programming begins. A successful review includes using associated documents (e.g. the annotated CRF, the SAP, the protocol, DST, SDTM mapping spec) to review the specifications. The team’s combined review should be thorough enough to have independently validated (i.e., recreated) the specifications.
The ADaM_Map_QC macro is suggested to be run prior to the start of ADB programming to evaluate the ADaM mapping specifications for potential errors, to detect missing information needed for the creation of the ADaM database, and to help ensure a standard template is being used for the mapping specifications.
Datasets
Dataset output name in lower case for XPT file creation, and start with "ad". Non-ADaM analysis datasets (analysis datasets created according to legacy company standard; does not follow the ADaM fundamental principles) should ideally start with "ax" and must never start with "ad".
Sort must be present and contain enough variables to uniquely identify records.
The label names of ADaM datasets should be different from those of the SDTM datasets.
Label length <= 40 and no special characters such as the following:
Unbalanced apostrophe, e.g., Parkinson's,
Unbalanced single and double quotation marks,
Unbalanced parenthesis, braces, or brackets, e.g., '(', '{', and '[',
'<' less-than sign and '>' greater-than sign.
Name length <= 8
Before final TLFs delivery, all ADaM datasets should be optimized to ensure all TLF programs still work on the optimized datasets.
PPD recommends the following data set names and labels for these common datasets:

ADSL: Subject-Level Analysis Dataset
ADAE: Adverse Event Analysis Dataset
ADCM: Concomitant Medication Analysis Dataset
ADLB: Laboratory Analysis Dataset
ADEG: Electrocardiogram Analysis Dataset
ADEX: Treatment Exposure Analysis Dataset
ADVS: Vital Signs Analysis Dataset
ADTTE: Time to Event Analysis Dataset
ADMH: Medical History Analysis Dataset
ADPE: Physical Examination Analysis Dataset
Variables
General
In general, variable attributes should follow standard SAS conventions. The following are recommended for ADaM variables:

Name has length less than 8 characters, be all uppercase, start with a letter (not underscore), and contain only letters, underscore and digits [1].
Label length <= 40 and no special characters[1] such as the following:
Unbalanced apostrophe, e.g., Parkinson's,
Unbalanced single and double quotation marks,
Unbalanced parenthesis, braces, or brackets, e.g., '(', '{', and '[',
'<' less-than sign and '>' greater-than sign.
Variable length <= 200[1]
Follow ADaM IG presentation for variable order in each dataset, SDTM variables needed for traceability should be listed after the ADaM variables. Variable ordering should be consistent across all datasets in a study.
Any variable in an ADaM dataset whose name is the same as an SDTM variable must be a copy of the SDTM variable, and its label, meaning, and values must not be modified. Length can differ due to file size optimization.
Variables names containing an index in the implementation guide must be created with the same number of digits, i.e. "y" must be replaced by one digit, and "xx" must be replaced by two digits.
Descriptive text is allowed at the end of the labels of variables whose names contain indexes "y" or "zz".
Numeric/Character variable name suffix/label explanation, –N or –C / (N) or (C);
In a pair of corresponding variables (e.g., TRTP/TRTPN, APERIOD/APERIODC), the primary or most commonly used variable does not have the suffix.[2] The label should only contain "(N)" or "(C)" if the variable name contains the suffix.
If SDTM character variables are converted to numeric variables in ADaM datasets, then they should be named as they are in the SDTM with an “N” suffix added (e.g. SEXN).
A pair of character and numeric variables only need to be created if it is helpful for analysis (i.e. RACEN does not need to be created, but it may be helpful for sorting)
Flag Variable Conventions:
Subject level flag in ADSL must have value as Y/N, null is not allowed.
For record/parameter level flag, null is allowed, and the value is normally Y/null.[3]
Character and numeric flag subject level variables must end with "FL" and “FN”, respectively.[4]
Dates/times
Numeric date variables should end with "DT" and have a valid SAS date format (the recommended format is Date9.).
Numeric date/time variables should end with "DTM" and have a valid SAS date/time format (the recommended format is Datetime19.).
Numeric time variables should end with “TM” and have a valid SAS time format (the recommended formats are Time5 and Tod5.).
Relative day variables should end with "DY" and have no day 0.
A variable for relative day of measurement/event (along with timing variables for visit) should be included when a dataset contains muliple records per subject.
Start timing variables should end with an "S" and the suffix indicating the type of timing (i.e. "SDT", "STM", "SDTM"), similarly end timing variables should end with an "E" and the timing suffix.
The ISO date variables in SDTM are recommended to be included for traceability and listing display purposes. If sponsor specifies, a character date variable ending with "DTL" may be created for listing display.
When a date/time imputation is required for a calculation, the imputed date/time should be stored in the relevant numeric timing variable. If any dates/times are imputed, an imputation flag variable (ending with "DTF" or "TMF") must be included indicating the highest level of imputation.
Analysis Data Subject Level (ADSL)
An ADaM-compliant ADSL dataset is required in a CDISC-based submission of data from a clinical trial. The structure of ADSL must be one record per subject.
Required variables are STUDYID, USUBJID, SUBJID, SITEID, AGE, AGEU, SEX, RACE, ARM, TRT01P, and at least one population indicator variable.
Population indicator variables cannot be blank; they must be "Y" or "N".[5]
TRT01P is used for a one-period study with additional TRTxxP variables used for additional treatments, TRTXXA variables are required when actual treatment does not match planned treatment,[6]
TRTSDT and TRTEDT should be used for the date of first and last exposure to any treatment on the entire study. If a subject participates in more than one treatment period, TRxxSDT and TRxxEDT should be used for the date of first and last exposure in each period described by the TRTxxP variables.
The analysis period timing variables (APxxSDT and APxxEDT) can be used to contain the range of dates a subject is considered on the treatment TRTxxP. For instance, if an adverse event is considered treatment-emergent if it occurs up to 30 days after the end of treatment, set APxxEDT = TRxxEDT + 30.
If any of the definitions of the timing variables for specific time element (phase, period, or sub-period) do vary (safety vs. efficacy), then none of the variables can be included in ADSL.
Grouping variables should end with "GRy". Use standard variable name/label for study status, disposition and discontinuation reason, treatment compliance/duration, death cause that are added in ADSL in ADaMIG v1.1.
Basic Data Structure (BDS)
Basic structure is one or more records per subject per analysis parameter per analysis timepoint. There are typically several BDS datasets in a study.
Similar to SDTM Findings domain but can be used for non-Findings data like exposure summary parameters and pre-specified event severities.
SDTM variables should not automatically be mapped to analogous ADaM variables (xxTEST to PARAM, xxDTC to ADT/ATM), instead BDS variables should be populated with information to facilitate analysis and to match the presentation needs of the tables.
Required variables are STUDYID, USUBJID, PARAM, PARAMCD, at least one of AVAL and AVALC, and at least one treatment variable (TRTP, TRTA, or TRTxxP)
PARAM: The value of PARAM should unambiguously describe the contents of AVAL/AVALC. PARAM must include all descriptive and qualifying information relevant to the analysis purpose of the parameter. If a parameter has units it should be included in PARAM. Other qualifiers like specimen type, location, and position must be included if necessary to differentiate with other parameters. If possible, PARAM should contain the text that is displayed in the tables. Value for PARAM may be longer than 40 characters in length but is restricted to a maximum of 200 characters.[7]
PARAMCD: This variable should be created in accordance with SAS v5 transport file variable naming convention (8 characters or less; starts with a letter; contains only letters and digits).[7] Value should be in uppercase. There must be a 1-to-1 mapping between PARAMCD and PARAM.
PARCATy: used to group PARAMs into categories and must be the same for all records for each unique PARAM. Unlike SDTM, it cannot be used to differentiate tests with similar names. (For instance, urinalysis and hematology red blood cell counts cannot have the same value PARAMCD differentiated by PARCATy, they must have unique values of PARAM and PARAMCD). Any given PARAM may be associated with at most one level of PARCATy.
AVAL/AVALC: For most parameters, only one of AVAL or AVALC will be populated, not both. For parameters with only numeric values being analyzed, it is not recommended to copy SDTM -–STRESC into AVALC since there is no analysis need for a character value. If it is desired for traceability or listing purposes to bring the value of –-STRESC into ADaM dataset, the variable -–STRESC may be copied as is without renaming it.
AVAL and AVALC are both populated only when there is a one-to-one mapping that may be useful. For instance, AVAL contains the score from questionnaire, and AVALC can be populated with the question answer text. If both AVAL and AVALC are populated, there must be 1-to-1 mapping between them within a given PARAM.
AVALCATy: Grouping of AVAL/AVALC, a particular value of AVAL/AVALC must have the same AVALCATy for all records within a PARAM. See also BASECATy, CHGCATy, and PCHGCATy.
BASE/ABLFL: If BASE is used and not missing there must be a record flagged with ABLFL="Y" for that subject within a PARAM and BASETYPE, BASE must be equal to the value of AVAL on the record where ABLFL="Y".
For shift tables consider using additional analysis and baseline pair variables like AVALCATy/BASECATy, ATOXGR/BTOXGR, and ANRIND/BNRIND.
AVISIT: required if an analysis is done by nominal, assigned or analysis visit. It should contain the visit names used for display in the tables, it is a derived field and does not have to map directly from the VISIT variables in SDTM and it can also be blank. For instance, if a table has a summary with the visit labelled as "Baseline" then the record flagged as baseline (i.e. ABLFL="Y") may have AVISIT="Baseline".
ADT/ATM/ADTM: These analysis timing variables are the dates/times associated with the value of AVAL/AVALC. ADY is a relative day but is not required to be anchored to RFSTDTC as in SDTM.
TRTP is used to indicate the treatment assigned to a record for analysis. For multiple treatment studies it should equal the TRTxxP defined by the record's value (xx) of APERIOD (see below). For single treatment studies, TRT01P from ADSL could be used in the dataset instead of deriving TRTP.
APERIOD must be one of numeric indexes found in the ADSL TRTxxP variables. One way to derive it is by setting it to the value xx for which ADT is in the range defined by APxxSDT and APxxEDT.
CRITyFL: use when records need to be flagged based on criteria that cannot otherwise be categorized by a CATy variable (i.e. not solely dependent on AVAL or depends on more than one variable). CRITy is required if CRITyFL exists.[8]
ANLzzFL should be used to ensure accurate selection of records for an analysis. This is particularly helpful when multiple records may exist for a particular visit.
For time-to-event analyses, use the time-to-event variables, namely AVAL, CNSR, ADT, and STARTDT, specified in the "The ADaM Basic Structure for Time-to-Event Analyses" document or ADAMIG v 1.1.
It is required to generate new records/rows for values that are derived from a function of multiple other records or transformation of AVAL, instead of adding new variables/columns.
When a value is derived from other time points under the same parameter (e.g. average, maximum, last value on treatment), PARAM stays the same with the derivation method described in DTYPE.
When a value is derived as a function of other parameters (e.g. body mass index) create a new parameter (PARAM) with derivation indicated in the metadata.
When bringing in records directly from an SDTM dataset to create an ADaM dataset, it is recommended to exclude "not done" records (both -–STRESN and -–STRESC missing) if the blank records do not contribute to analysis. (it is permissible for both AVAL and AVALC to be missing if needed).
OCCDS (Occurrence Data Structure)
Used for analyses that require counting the number of times an event or intervention occurred. Basic structure is one record per subject per occurrence.
Variables required for the analysis (in particular, coding variables) should be directly copied from the source SDTM datasets and supplemented with variables found in the OCCDS guide.
Required variables are STUDYID, USUBJID, --SEQ, topic variable (i.e. --TERM, --TRT) from source SDTM dataset, and at least one treatment variable (TRTP, TRTA, or TRTxxP). AEDECOD, AEBODSYS, and AESER are required for adverse event data. CMTRT is required for medication data.
ACATy can be used to group occurrences and can differ from --CAT.
Use ASTDT/ASTTM and AENDT/AENTM to contain numeric, formatted, possibly-imputed versions of --STDTC and --ENDTC SDTM variables. ASTDY and AENDY can be used for relative days and can be calculated differently than --STDY and --ENDY.
APERIOD must be one of numeric indexes found in the ADSL TRTxxP variables. One way to derive it is by setting it to the value xx for which ASTDT is in the range defined by APxxSDT and APxxEDT. TRTP can then be set to the value of TRTxxP where APERIOD = xx.
ANLzzFL should be used to ensure accurate selection of records for an analysis.
Treatment emergent flags should be named TRTEMFL. See also ONTRTFL, PREFL, and FUPFL for additional flags that can be used to identify how an occurrence relates to study timing.
Occurrence Flag Variables: Do not create the permissible occurrence flag variables in an OCCDS dataset (i.e. AOCCFL, AOCCSFL, AOCCPFL), Each level of occurrence count has been handled in the Certified Content.pngArtZ Macros created for occurrence summary tables (e.g. adverse event counts).
ASEV, AREL, ATOXGR should be used to derive imputed values if the analysis requires imputation of missing SDTM variables (i.e. AREL="Related" if AEREL=""). If no imputation or derivation is required, these variables do not need to be created.
ADAM OTHER class
Main article: ADAM OTHER class
Analysis datasets that follow the ADaM fundamental principles and other ADaM conventions such as dataset and variable naming conventions, but that do not follow one of the three defined structures (ADSL, BDS, OCCDS), are considered to be in the Certified Content.pngADAM OTHER class.[9]
Controlled Terminology
The most current version of an FDA-supported terminology (i.e. CDISC controlled terminology) should be used when coding is performed on a study. Most recent versions of the ADaM and SDTM controlled terminology can be found in the respective CDISC Macro/Resources folder in the Global Bios Library.
Additional
To ensure compliance to CDISC standards and high quality deliverables, ADaM QC checks should be performed prior to any formal delivery utilizing PPD's internal QC check macro, DoD_QC.sas (if applicable), in addition to Pinnacle 21 Enterprise.
Add common Pinnacle 21 issues found to the Common Issues on the OpenCDISC Report document on Content Server.
Common CDISC ADaM implementation questions and answers can be found at Certified Content.pngADaM Frequently Asked Questions.
Guidance for define.xml via Define on Demand (DoD) can be found at Define on Demand.
Contact

Introduction
This manual addresses the strategy and principles to use for the specification of analysis database (ADB) and Analysis Data Model (ADaM) database. The ADB specification template is attached to SOP-17024 (Legacy: SOP-BST-06). This manual is intended for all Biostatistics & Programming personnel. Management recognizes there may be circumstances in which deviations from the manual are needed. In these situations, it is necessary to discuss the deviations with management and the project team. Both should agree the deviation is necessary for completion of the project work.

Preparation process
ADaMSpecProcess.png

Creation process
Once the SAP and clinical database design are in place (the client must approve the SAP), the project team is prepared to create the specifications. Development of specifications is a team effort. All project programmers and statisticians are part of the development team and they are expected to review the specifications and provide input on an ongoing basis as new information is obtained. The biostatistics project lead (BPL) is responsible for ensuring the specifications are completed, however, other members of the project team may assist in spec authorship. For detailed information involves the creation of ADaM file specifications, numerous “tips” and recommendations, see ADaM Specifications Writing.

Roles
BPL
Collaborates with the Client regarding their preferred level of involvement and oversight according to SOP-BST-01
Collaborates closely with the LS and LP to ensure the tasks and responsibilities are delegated and covered by team members qualified to perform the task.
Ensures specifications for the datasets necessary for analysis are created containing:
A list or chart showing how all datasets to be included in the analysis database are logically related to one another, including a brief summary description of each analysis dataset
A list of all variables that are common across datasets (e.g., subject number, investigator, age, sex)
Labels, formats, description, and detailed instructions for computing derived variables
Specifications that all source variables are retained or details of which variables will be retained/omitted.
PPD policy is to put all derived subject level data values needed to support the analysis within the analysis database.
Note that the above specifications and information are typically captured within the PPD standard ADaM Specification template.

Ensures any references or methodologies introduced into the specifications by PPD (e.g., normal ranges, conversion factors) are confirmed in writing (e.g., e-mail) by the Client.
Ensures planned quality checks are specified, as appropriate, to verify the integrity and validity of the analysis design and referenced data, and the robustness to data changes of the programming.
Collaborates with LS & LP to Distribute the analysis database (ADB) specifications and planned quality checks, along with any applicable guidelines to the appropriate members of the Biostatistics team for review.
Lead Statistician/Lead Programmer
Although there aren’t any constraints on which Biostatistics project team member authors the analysis database specifications, typically either the Lead Statistician or the Lead Programmer will develop the analysis database specifications.

Documents needed for analysis database spec creation (and review)
Study Protocol
Annotated Case Report Form (final/authorized version)
Remember to work with DM, and review the DVM & DIA to ensure you are aware of what data is collected and where, to ensure all relevant data is referenced in the analysis database specifications
SDTM Mapping Specifications, including the following:
List of CDISC Controlled Terminology for all –TEST and –TESTCD variables expected in the SDTM data (Provided by the Lead Programmer [LP])
List of possible values of VISIT and VISITNUM variables expected in the SDTM data provided in the Trial Design Trial Visit (TV) specification
Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) including TLF Shells (approved by the Sponsor)
Study Deviation Rules Document
List of Standardized MedDRA Query Names (or Numbers) provided by the Sponsor if summaries of AEs of Special Interest are planned
A copy of the applicable version of the CDISC SDTM Implementation Guide
A copy of the applicable version of CDISC SDTM Controlled Terminology
A copy of the applicable version of the CDISC ADaM Implementation Guide
A copy of the applicable version of CDISC ADaM Controlled Terminology
CDISC Therapeutic Area User Guides (TAUG), if available
A copy of any applicable Sponsor-defined Controlled Terminology
Copies of all vendor data transfer specifications (e.g. IRT, labs, ECGs, eTablet questionnaires, etc.)
List of all possible results for each planned categorical lab parameter (e.g. urinalysis) provided by the central lab vendor
List of all reference range values for each planned lab parameter provided by the central lab vendor
Scoring guidelines (preferably published by the author) for all questionnaires
Copies of the surrogate randomization schedule and surrogate material schedule(s)
PPD ADB Spec Template or sponsor-provided analysis file template, whichever is applicable
ADaM spec contents
The ADB specifications are written instructions that define the source data, which variables to use, description of the algorithm required for derived variables, structure, format, and any derivations that the Programmer may need to perform to generate the desired output datasets. In order to begin production of the analysis database, the client must approve the SAP, and the specs must be completed and agreed upon by the team.
The PPD ADaM Specification template should be used for creating the ADB specifications, unless there is a client requirement to use a client specific template for ADB specifications. The PPD ADaM QC macros and PPD ADaM define.xml process require the use of the PPD ADaM template. In BTI environment, the single ADB spec file should reside in the <study area Trunk or Branch>\Documents\Specs folder. The ADB Specifications should be a stand-alone document with respect to the algorithms used in creating the ADB.
Algorithms defined in the SAP should be repeated in the specifications. As a rule, the specifications should not reference other documents for algorithms. Information not related to the algorithm that is provided in other standard documents (e.g., annotated CRF) is not expected to be on the specifications.
All significant derivations of the raw data that are required for TLF generation should be done within the analysis database. In the case that a variable needed for TLF programming was omitted from the analysis database, (typically noted by the TLF spec author or programmer) the developer of the analysis database specs should add the additional variable to the analysis database specifications.
In general, the goal of the spec is to describe the end result to be achieved by the programmer, not to map out the all of the details of how to achieve that end result. Therefore, SAS code is prohibited and pseudo code is generally to be avoided in the specifications.
The method for handling missing values should be addressed when applicable.
Potential data issues, issues that may warrant a change to current algorithms, unexpected data outcome, or unscheduled events should be checked, either by a chosen programming team member per the written QC checks or the team member that is programming the ADB. Important QC checks to help identify data issues or issues that may warrant a change of the current algorithms should be mentioned in the “Quality Check” column of the ADB specification.
ADaM format, structure and variable naming conventions are recommended.
For ADB program names, please follow the Standard Naming Conventions.
Review process
Review of specifications by appropriate team members (Lead Programmer, Lead Statistician, Senior Reviewer, and all supporting team members as applicable to their role) should occur before any programming begins. Careful attention should be paid to ensure that the objectives of the project are met by the analysis database design, that the approach is programmable and efficient, and that the specifications are robust (i.e., they account for all possibilities including missing values; they aren’t unnecessarily dependent on an assumed structure, etc.) It is also particularly important to ensure that the analysis database specifications appropriately correspond with the intent and structure of the associated TLF specifications. The team’s combined review should be thorough enough to have independently validated (i.e., recreated) every detail of the specifications. Every single part of the specification must be verified against established criteria. It must also be considered whether there is anything missing from the specification. We rely on independent validation as the basis of quality for our programming deliverables. Therefore, it is essential that the specifications, which this double programming is based on, are correct. Specification accuracy is the entire team’s responsibility. It is unrealistic to assume that the specification author will get everything 100% right. For detailed information about ADaM spec review information see ADaM Specifications Review.

Roles
BPL
Ensures appropriate review of specifications takes place, e.g., by chairing a specification review meeting where comments from the Lead Programmer, Lead Statistician and Senior Reviewer are discussed
Ensures revisions to the analysis database specifications and planned quality checks are completed based on feedback from the Biostatistics team
Obtains agreement of the specifications and planned quality checks from the Lead Programmer, Lead Statistician and Senior Reviewer (documented in a biostatistics electronic internal review form, also known as an eIRF)
After internal review and agreement, delivers the analysis database specifications to the Client, if requested
Lead Statistician/Lead Programmer/Senior Reviewer
SR, LP, and LS will do a complete review of the spec. As appropriate to their role, draft/complete review of the analysis database specifications (including any planned quality checks). This includes but is not limited to:
For the Lead Statistician, specifications set forth a design for the analysis methodology consistent with the established criteria
For the Lead Programmer and support programmers, specifications should be unambiguous, programmable and consistent with the established criteria
For the Senior Reviewer, all statistical methods in the specifications have indeed been reviewed by him/herself or another qualified Biostatistics Project Team member
To ensure a successful review, as appropriate to their role, the LS, LP, SR will cross check the ADB Specifications with annotated CRF or comparable document (e.g., MSL from EDC study), the SAP, the protocol, proc contents output (if available), DST, and mapping (SDTM) specifications considering the following:
Data field/values against their source for appropriateness
Always consider ADB and TLF specs in parallel
Ensure logic and presentation matches the SAP
Be sure all variables needed for your TLFs are in the ADB (see example below). Note that it is acceptable to program some listings directly from the SDTM data.
Ensure critical data, other data having a significant impact on analysis, and derivations unique to the study, have been appropriately derived within the mapping (SDTM) specifications and appropriately carried through to the ADB. Note that TLFs on these data should not be programmed directly from SDTM. Note: Per SOP-GCD-01, critical data is data collected to support the primary safety and efficacy objectives noted in the protocol.
Compare to protocol, industry regulations, client guidelines, as applicable
Assure that any transformations to source data (e.g., mapping specifications) referenced by the analysis database specifications are appropriately assessed for impact
Ensure that the format and display of any blinded/masked randomization information are consistent in structure (case and length) with the actual unblinded values assigned within the study (e.g., surrogate schedule)
Ensure planned quality checks are specified (e.g., a Quality Validation Plan (preferred); or within analysis database specifications).
Review the planned quality checks for completeness and accuracy
Work together (e.g., by attending a specification review meeting) to obtain agreement (documented in an eIRF) on the analysis database specifications and any planned quality checks.
Documents needed for spec review
See Documents needed for analysis database spec creation (and review)

Quality Checks for the ADB spec and study data
ADaM_MAP_QC
The ADaM_MAP_QC macro is used to evaluate the ADaM mapping specifications for potential errors or missing information needed for the creation of the ADaM database. For full details on the ADaM_MAP_QC macro see CDISC ADaM macros.

DOD_QC
The DOD_QC macro performs quality checks to ensure compliance between ADaM datasets and the ADaMIG. For full details on the macro see the reference material on the BioWiki, see Define on Demand#Quality checks.

Quality Validation
Quality Validation (QV) should be designed before analysis database production and programming begins, but during or after the specifications are completed. Quality Validation will list out any pre-identified deliverable-specific quality checks needed to ensure the accuracy and consistency of the given deliverable package as delivered to the client. Any quality checks applicable to the analysis database that support TLF development are encouraged to be incorporated into the analysis database programming in lieu of within the TLFs, since finding issues sooner in the process will reduce the impact of associated rework. The quality validation plan (QVP) may be incorporated into the specifications or as a stand alone document, this remains study specific so far.

Maintenance process
The specifications are living documents that will have to be updated as programming occurs. After specifications have been released, future specification changes will be documented in a modification log. The spec author will communicate immediately to all affected team members and programming activities. The specifications are required to be re-reviewed by the team after any updates/changes are made. This includes a check that any updates are also carried through to anywhere else they have impact such as other ADB specs and TLF specs. Development and review of specifications is a team effort. Therefore, when programming keep in mind that all programmers and statisticians are part of the development team and they are expected to raise any questions or ambiguities noted as the algorithm is applied to the actual data. The specifications are living documents that will be updated and re-reviewed as programming occurs. However, a copy of the reviewed specifications at the time of each deliverable will be saved via the tagging of the deliverable.

Roles
BPL
If analysis database specification modifications are made after programming has commenced, ensures that these are reviewed, tracked appropriately and implemented in analysis database programs and corresponding validation programs prior to re-delivery to the Client.

Lead Statistician/Lead Programmer/Senior Reviewer
Prior to any delivery based upon the analysis database specifications, review any analysis database specification or planned quality check modifications made after programming has commenced against the established criteria as applicable to their role.
Work with the Biostatistics Project Team to verify the accuracy and completeness of the specifications and planned quality checks once adequate data has accrued.

Modification
Specifications will be maintained by making approved updates as needed.

Always raise questions you have on specifications. Do not assume the specification is correct if there is something that does not seem right.
Always review the dataset produced, and apply necessary quality checks, to verify that values are plausible and compliant to the specification.
Specifications will be maintained by making and reviewing approved updates as needed, always considering where the update may impact elsewhere.
There should be a modifications log to track the changes. Highlighting the specific portions that changed is also recommended. A modification log will be put in a dedicated tab with at least the following information: person who made the modification, date of the modification, and a description of the modification and why it was needed. If a change is global in nature, it can also be put on 1 line in each dataset spec with a dataset identifier of “General”. This should be done with care, as need to ensure the update is made in all applicable places.
The programming tracking file may need to be updated when the program and/or validation program are updated to include the specification modification. This programming tracking file will minimally include a description of the dataset, program name, programmer, validation program name, quality validator, and production status. Program names should follow program naming convention.

